Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF727.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [273.1388] REDEVELOPMENT AREA HOMESTEAD CREDIT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin Property is eligible to receive the credit under this section if it is classified as 1a or 1b under section 273.13, subdivision 22, and is located in a city of the second class that was designated as a redevelopment area by the United States Department of Commerce under the Public Works and Economic Development Act of 1965, Public Law 89-136, title IV, section 401(a)(4). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Credit amount. new text end new text begin For each qualifying property, the credit under this section is equal to 70 percent multiplied by the property's net tax capacity multiplied by the city capital debt tax rate determined under section 275.08, subdivision 1b, paragraph (d). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Credit reimbursements. new text end new text begin The county auditor shall determine the tax reductions allowed under this section within the county for each taxes payable year and shall certify that amount to the commissioner of revenue under section 270C.85, subdivision 2, clause (4). The county auditor shall also certify any prior year adjustments. The commissioner shall review the certifications for accuracy, and may make such changes as are deemed necessary, or return the certification to the county auditor for correction. The credit under this section must be used to reduce the city net tax capacity-based property tax as provided in section 273.1393. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Payment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of revenue shall reimburse each local taxing jurisdiction for the tax reductions granted under this section in two equal installments on October 31 and December 26 of the taxes payable year for which the reductions are granted, including in each payment the prior year adjustments certified under section 270C.85, subdivision 2, for that taxes payable year. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin An amount sufficient to make payments required by this section is annually appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with taxes payable in 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 273.1392, is amended to read: 273.1392 PAYMENT; SCHOOL DISTRICTS. The amounts of bovine tuberculosis credit reimbursements under section 273.113; conservation tax credits under section 273.119; disaster or emergency reimbursement under sections 273.1231 to 273.1235; agricultural credits under sections 273.1384 and 273.1387;new text begin the redevelopment area homestead credit under section 273.1388;new text end aids and credits under section 273.1398; enterprise zone property credit payments under section 469.171; metropolitan agricultural preserve reduction under section 473H.10; and electric generation transition aid under section 477A.24 for school districts, shall be certified to the Department of Education by the Department of Revenue. The amounts so certified shall be paid according to section 127A.45, subdivisions 9, 10, and 13. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with fiscal year 2027. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 273.1393, is amended to read: 273.1393 COMPUTATION OF NET PROPERTY TAXES. Notwithstanding any other provisions to the contrary, "net" property taxes are determined by subtracting the credits in the order listed from the gross tax: (1) disaster credit as provided in sections 273.1231 to 273.1235; (2) powerline credit as provided in section 273.42; (3) agricultural preserves credit as provided in section 473H.10; (4) enterprise zone credit as provided in section 469.171; (5) disparity reduction credit; (6) conservation tax credit as provided in section 273.119; (7) the school bond credit as provided in section 273.1387; (8) agricultural credit as provided in section 273.1384; (9) taconite homestead credit as provided in section 273.135; (10) supplemental homestead credit as provided in section 273.1391; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (11) the bovine tuberculosis zone credit, as provided in section 273.113deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (12) the redevelopment area homestead credit, as provided in section 273.1388. new text end The combination of all property tax credits must not exceed the gross tax amount. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with taxes payable in 2026. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 275.065, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Notice of proposed property taxes. (a) The county auditor shall prepare and the county treasurer shall deliver after November 10 and on or before November 24 each year, by first class mail to each taxpayer at the address listed on the county's current year's assessment roll, a notice of proposed property taxes. Upon written request by the taxpayer, the treasurer may send the notice in electronic form or by electronic mail instead of on paper or by ordinary mail. (b) The commissioner of revenue shall prescribe the form of the notice. (c) The notice must inform taxpayers that it contains the amount of property taxes each taxing authority proposes to collect for taxes payable the following year. In the case of a town, or in the case of the state general tax, the final tax amount will be its proposed tax. The notice must clearly state for each city that has a population over 500, county, school district, regional library authority established under section 134.201, metropolitan taxing districts as defined in paragraph (i), and fire protection and emergency medical services special taxing districts established under section 144F.01, the time and place of a meeting for each taxing authority in which the budget and levy will be discussed and public input allowed, prior to the final budget and levy determination. The taxing authorities must provide the county auditor with the information to be included in the notice on or before the time it certifies its proposed levy under subdivision 1. The public must be allowed to speak at that meeting, which must occur after November 24 and must not be held before 6:00 p.m. It must provide a website address and a telephone number for the taxing authority that taxpayers may call if they have questions related to the notice and an address where comments will be received by mail, except that no notice required under this section shall be interpreted as requiring the printing of a personal telephone number or address as the contact information for a taxing authority. If a taxing authority does not maintain a website or public offices where telephone calls can be received by the authority, the authority may inform the county of the lack of a public website or telephone number and the county shall not list a website or telephone number for that taxing authority. (d) The notice must state for each parcel: (1) the market value of the property as determined under section 273.11, and used for computing property taxes payable in the following year and for taxes payable in the current year as each appears in the records of the county assessor on November 1 of the current year; and, in the case of residential property, whether the property is classified as homestead or nonhomestead. The notice must clearly inform taxpayers of the years to which the market values apply and that the values are final values; (2) the items listed below, shown separately by county, city or town, and state general tax, agricultural homestead credit under section 273.1384, school building bond agricultural credit under section 273.1387,new text begin the redevelopment area homestead credit under section 273.1388,new text end voter approved school levy, other local school levy, and the sum of the special taxing districts, and as a total of all taxing authorities: (i) the actual tax for taxes payable in the current year; and (ii) the proposed tax amount. If the county levy under clause (2) includes an amount for a lake improvement district as defined under sections 103B.501 to 103B.581, the amount attributable for that purpose must be separately stated from the remaining county levy amount. In the case of a town or the state general tax, the final tax shall also be its proposed tax unless the town changes its levy at a special town meeting under section 365.52. If a school district has certified under section 126C.17, subdivision 9, that a referendum will be held in the school district at the November general election, the county auditor must note next to the school district's proposed amount that a referendum is pending and that, if approved by the voters, the tax amount may be higher than shown on the notice. In the case of the city of Minneapolis, the levy for Minneapolis Park and Recreation shall be listed separately from the remaining amount of the city's levy. In the case of the city of St. Paul, the levy for the St. Paul Library Agency must be listed separately from the remaining amount of the city's levy. In the case of Ramsey County, any amount levied under section 134.07 may be listed separately from the remaining amount of the county's levy. In the case of a parcel where tax increment or the fiscal disparities areawide tax under chapter 276A or 473F applies, the proposed tax levy on the captured value or the proposed tax levy on the tax capacity subject to the areawide tax must each be stated separately and not included in the sum of the special taxing districts; and (3) the increase or decrease between the total taxes payable in the current year and the total proposed taxes, expressed as a percentage. For purposes of this section, the amount of the tax on homesteads qualifying under the senior citizens' property tax deferral program under chapter 290B is the total amount of property tax before subtraction of the deferred property tax amount. (e) The notice must clearly state that the proposed or final taxes do not include the following: (1) special assessments; (2) levies approved by the voters after the date the proposed taxes are certified, including bond referenda and school district levy referenda; (3) a levy limit increase approved by the voters by the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of the levy year as provided under section 275.73; (4) amounts necessary to pay cleanup or other costs due to a natural disaster occurring after the date the proposed taxes are certified; (5) amounts necessary to pay tort judgments against the taxing authority that become final after the date the proposed taxes are certified; and (6) the contamination tax imposed on properties which received market value reductions for contamination. (f) Except as provided in subdivision 7, failure of the county auditor to prepare or the county treasurer to deliver the notice as required in this section does not invalidate the proposed or final tax levy or the taxes payable pursuant to the tax levy. (g) If the notice the taxpayer receives under this section lists the property as nonhomestead, and satisfactory documentation is provided to the county assessor by the applicable deadline, and the property qualifies for the homestead classification in that assessment year, the assessor shall reclassify the property to homestead for taxes payable in the following year. (h) In the case of class 4 residential property used as a residence for lease or rental periods of 30 days or more, the taxpayer must either: (1) mail or deliver a copy of the notice of proposed property taxes to each tenant, renter, or lessee; or (2) post a copy of the notice in a conspicuous place on the premises of the property. The notice must be mailed or posted by the taxpayer by November 27 or within three days of receipt of the notice, whichever is later. A taxpayer may notify the county treasurer of the address of the taxpayer, agent, caretaker, or manager of the premises to which the notice must be mailed in order to fulfill the requirements of this paragraph. (i) For purposes of this subdivision and subdivision 6, "metropolitan special taxing districts" means the following taxing districts in the seven-county metropolitan area that levy a property tax for any of the specified purposes listed below: (1) Metropolitan Council under section 473.132, 473.167, 473.249, 473.325, 473.446, 473.521, 473.547, or 473.834; (2) Metropolitan Airports Commission under section 473.667, 473.671, or 473.672; and (3) Metropolitan Mosquito Control Commission under section 473.711. For purposes of this section, any levies made by the regional rail authorities in the county of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, or Washington under chapter 398A shall be included with the appropriate county's levy. (j) The governing body of a county, city, or school district may, with the consent of the county board, include supplemental information with the statement of proposed property taxes about the impact of state aid increases or decreases on property tax increases or decreases and on the level of services provided in the affected jurisdiction. This supplemental information may include information for the following year, the current year, and for as many consecutive preceding years as deemed appropriate by the governing body of the county, city, or school district. It may include only information regarding: (1) the impact of inflation as measured by the implicit price deflator for state and local government purchases; (2) population growth and decline; (3) state or federal government action; and (4) other financial factors that affect the level of property taxation and local services that the governing body of the county, city, or school district may deem appropriate to include. The information may be presented using tables, written narrative, and graphic representations and may contain instruction toward further sources of information or opportunity for comment. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with taxes payable in 2026. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 275.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin City capital projects levies. new text end new text begin Each city containing property eligible for the redevelopment area homestead credit under section 273.1388 must certify to the county auditor the portion of the city levy that is levied for repayment of capital improvement bonds issued under section 475.521. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with taxes payable in 2026. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 275.08, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. Computation of tax rates. (a) The amounts certified to be levied against net tax capacity under section 275.07 by an individual local government unit shall be divided by the total net tax capacity of all taxable properties within the local government unit's taxing jurisdiction. The resulting ratio, the local government's local tax rate, multiplied by each property's net tax capacity shall be each property's net tax capacity tax for that local government unit before reduction by any credits. (b) The auditor must also determine the school debt tax rate for each school district equal to (1) the school debt service levy certified under section 275.07, subdivision 2, divided by (2) the total net tax capacity of all taxable property within the district. (c) Any amount certified to the county auditor to be levied against market value shall be divided by the total referendum market value of all taxable properties within the taxing district. The resulting ratio, the taxing district's new referendum tax rate, multiplied by each property's referendum market value shall be each property's new referendum tax before reduction by any credits. For the purposes of this subdivision, "referendum market value" means the market value as defined in section 126C.01, subdivision 3. new text begin (d) The auditor in a county that contains property eligible for the redevelopment area homestead credit under section 273.1388 must also determine the city capital debt tax rate for each city containing eligible properties. For the purposes of this paragraph, the city capital debt tax rate is equal to (1) the city's levy amount certified under section 275.07, subdivision 2a, divided by (2) the total net tax capacity of all taxable property within the city. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with taxes payable in 2026. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 276.04, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Contents of tax statements. (a) The treasurer shall provide for the printing of the tax statements. The commissioner of revenue shall prescribe the form of the property tax statement and its contents. The tax statement must not state or imply that property tax credits are paid by the state of Minnesota. The statement must contain a tabulated statement of the dollar amount due to each taxing authority and the amount of the state tax from the parcel of real property for which a particular tax statement is prepared. The dollar amounts attributable to the county, the state tax, the voter approved school tax, the other local school tax, the township or municipality, and the total of the metropolitan special taxing districts as defined in section 275.065, subdivision 3, paragraph (i), must be separately stated. The amounts due all other special taxing districts, if any, may be aggregated except that any levies made by the regional rail authorities in the county of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, or Washington under chapter 398A shall be listed on a separate line directly under the appropriate county's levy. If the county levy under this paragraph includes an amount for a lake improvement district as defined under sections 103B.501 to 103B.581, the amount attributable for that purpose must be separately stated from the remaining county levy amount. In the case of Ramsey County, if the county levy under this paragraph includes an amount for public library service under section 134.07, the amount attributable for that purpose may be separated from the remaining county levy amount. The amount of the tax on homesteads qualifying under the senior citizens' property tax deferral program under chapter 290B is the total amount of property tax before subtraction of the deferred property tax amount. The amount of the tax on contamination value imposed under sections 270.91 to 270.98, if any, must also be separately stated. The dollar amounts, including the dollar amount of any special assessments, may be rounded to the nearest even whole dollar. For purposes of this section whole odd-numbered dollars may be adjusted to the next higher even-numbered dollar. (b) The property tax statements for manufactured homes and sectional structures taxed as personal property shall contain the same information that is required on the tax statements for real property. (c) Real and personal property tax statements must contain the following information in the order given in this paragraph. The information must contain the current year tax information in the right column with the corresponding information for the previous year in a column on the left: (1) the property's estimated market value under section 273.11, subdivision 1; (2) the property's homestead market value exclusion under section 273.13, subdivision 35; (3) the property's taxable market value under section 272.03, subdivision 15; (4) the property's gross tax, before credits; (5) for agricultural properties, the credits under sections 273.1384 and 273.1387; (6) any credits received under sections 273.119; 273.1234 or 273.1235; 273.135;new text begin 273.1388;new text end 273.1391; 273.1398, subdivision 4; 469.171; and 473H.10, except that the amount of credit received under section 273.135 must be separately stated and identified as "taconite tax relief"; and (7) the net tax payable in the manner required in paragraph (a). (d) If the county uses envelopes for mailing property tax statements and if the county agrees, a taxing district may include a notice with the property tax statement notifying taxpayers when the taxing district will begin its budget deliberations for the current year, and encouraging taxpayers to attend the hearings. If the county allows notices to be included in the envelope containing the property tax statement, and if more than one taxing district relative to a given property decides to include a notice with the tax statement, the county treasurer or auditor must coordinate the process and may combine the information on a single announcement. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with taxes payable in 2026. new text end